Hawaii statutes.
§412:5-303 Loans to executive officers,
directors, principal shareholders and affiliates. No bank shall make any
loan or extension of credit in violation of section 18(j) of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. §1828(j) or, if the bank is a member of the
Federal Reserve System, in violation of sections 22(g), 22(h), 23A or 23B of
the Federal Reserve Act, 12 U.S.C. §§375a, 375b, 371c and 371c-1. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next